Utah statutes.
72-10-129.   Expenditures for Civil Air Patrol.
(1)  The division may expend state aeronautics funds for the Utah wing of the
Civil Air Patrol to be used to:
(a)  purchase aviation facilities, training, supplies, and equipment;
(b)  defray maintenance and rental costs of hangar facilities and aircraft;
(c)  purchase maintenance supplies and equipment for the communications
network of the Civil Air Patrol; and
(d)  provide administrative costs approved by the division.
(2)  The expenditures may not exceed in any fiscal year the amount
appropriated to the Utah wing of the Civil Air Patrol by the Legislature.
